District of Columbia statutes.
1-632.06

Express retention of certain District of Columbia laws.

The express provisions of the following District of Columbia laws shall continue in force and are not to be considered impliedly repealed in any manner by the provisions of this chapter:

(1)

The provisions of Title 18 of the United States Code insofar as they affect employees of the District of Columbia government shall not be affected by this chapter: Provided, however, that this provision shall not be construed to prohibit coverage of volunteers under the provisions of subchapter XXIII of this chapter;

(2)

The provisions of § 1-319.01 et seq. shall continue in force except that volunteers shall be entitled to disability compensation as provided in subchapter XXIII of this chapter;

(3)

The provisions of §§ 1-504 and 28-2701 shall continue in force;

(4)

Section 1-521.01 shall continue in force;

(5)

Section 2-1401.01 et seq. shall continue in force; and

(6)

The Metropolitan Police Officer Civil Rights Act (D.C. Law 2-71).

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3206, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-633.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-362.4.